Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.130

Person to whom power or authority to direct or control acts of fiduciary or investments of a trust is conferred deemed a fiduciary—Liability.

Whenever power or authority to direct or control the acts of a fiduciary or the investments of a trust is conferred directly or indirectly upon any person other than the designated trustee of the trust, such person shall be deemed to be a fiduciary and shall be liable to the beneficiaries of the trust and to the designated trustee to the same extent as if he or she were a designated trustee in relation to the exercise or nonexercise of such power or authority.

[ 1995 c 307 s 6; 1985 c 30 s 77. Prior: 1973 1st ex.s. c 89 s 2. Formerly RCW 30.24.130.]

NOTES:

Application—1995 c 307: See note following RCW 11.100.010.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.